static/dict/fr-FR/fr-FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX iC Y 41
SFX iC rir rir/n'q'd'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rant/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir ert/L'D'Q' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir erts/D'Q' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir erte/L'D'Q' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir ertes/D'Q' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir re/n'q'j'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir res/n'q'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rons/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rez/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rent/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rais/n'q'j'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rait/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rions/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir riez/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir raient/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir ris/n'q'j'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rit/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rîmes/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rîtes/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirent/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirai/n'q'j'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir riras/n'q'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rira/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirons/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirez/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir riront/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirais/n'q'j'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rirait/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir ririons/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir ririez/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir riraient/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir risse/n'q'j'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir risses/n'q'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rît/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rissions/n'q'l't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rissiez/n'q'l'm' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rissent/n'q'l'm't's' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir re/n'l'm't' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rons/n'l' [vf]rir
SFX iC rir rez/n'l'm' [vf]rir

SFX iD Y 43
SFX iD courir courir/n'q'd' courir
SFX iD courir courant/n'q' courir
SFX iD courir couru courir
SFX iD courir courus courir
SFX iD courir courue courir
SFX iD courir courues courir
SFX iD courir cours/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir court/n' courir
SFX iD courir courons/n' courir
SFX iD courir courez/n' courir
SFX iD courir courent/n' courir
SFX iD courir courais/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir courait/n' courir
SFX iD courir courions/n' courir
SFX iD courir couriez/n' courir
SFX iD courir couraient/n' courir
SFX iD courir courus/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir courut/n' courir
SFX iD courir courûmes/n' courir
SFX iD courir courûtes/n' courir
SFX iD courir coururent/n' courir
SFX iD courir courrai/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir courras/n' courir
SFX iD courir courra/n' courir
SFX iD courir courrons/n' courir
SFX iD courir courrez/n' courir
SFX iD courir courront/n' courir
SFX iD courir courrais/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir courrait/n' courir
SFX iD courir courrions/n' courir
SFX iD courir courriez/n' courir
SFX iD courir courraient/n' courir
SFX iD courir coure/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir coures/n' courir
SFX iD courir courusse/n'j' courir
SFX iD courir courusses/n' courir
SFX iD courir courût/n' courir
SFX iD courir courussions/n' courir
SFX iD courir courussiez/n' courir
SFX iD courir courussent/n' courir
SFX iD courir cours/n' courir
SFX iD courir courons/n' courir
SFX iD courir courez/n' courir

SFX iE Y 43
SFX iE ourir ourir/n'q'd'l'm't's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourant/n'q'm't's' courir
SFX iE ourir ouru/L'D'Q' courir
SFX iE ourir ourus/D'Q' courir
SFX iE ourir ourue/L'D'Q' courir
SFX iE ourir ourues/D'Q' courir
SFX iE ourir ours/n'q'j'l'm't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourt/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourons/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourez/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourent/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourais/n'q'j'l'm't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourait/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourions/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ouriez/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ouraient/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourus/n'q'j'l'm't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourut/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourûmes/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourûtes/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir oururent/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrai/n'q'j'l'm' courir
SFX iE ourir ourras/n'q'l't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourra/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrons/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrez/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourront/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrais/n'q'j'l'm't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrait/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourrions/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourriez/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourraient/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir oure/n'q'j'l'm's' courir
SFX iE ourir oures/n'l't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourusse/n'q'j'l'm' courir
SFX iE ourir ourusses/n'q'l't' courir
SFX iE ourir ourût/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ourussions/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourussiez/n'q'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourussent/n'q'l's' courir
SFX iE ourir ours/n'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourons/n'l' courir
SFX iE ourir ourez/n'l' courir

SFX iF N 42
SFX iF ervir ervant servir
SFX iF ervir ervi servir
SFX iF ervir ervis servir
SFX iF ervir ervie servir
SFX iF ervir ervies servir
SFX iF ervir ers servir
SFX iF ervir ert servir
SFX iF ervir ervons servir
SFX iF ervir ervez servir
SFX iF ervir ervent servir
SFX iF ervir ervais servir
SFX iF ervir ervait servir
SFX iF ervir ervions servir
SFX iF ervir erviez servir
SFX iF ervir ervaient servir
SFX iF ervir ervis servir
SFX iF ervir ervit servir
SFX iF ervir ervîmes servir
SFX iF ervir ervîtes servir
SFX iF ervir ervirent servir
SFX iF ervir ervirai servir
SFX iF ervir erviras servir
SFX iF ervir ervira servir
SFX iF ervir ervirons servir
SFX iF ervir ervirez servir
SFX iF ervir erviront servir
SFX iF ervir ervirais servir
SFX iF ervir ervirait servir
SFX iF ervir ervirions servir
SFX iF ervir erviriez servir
SFX iF ervir erviraient servir
SFX iF ervir erve servir
SFX iF ervir erves servir
SFX iF ervir ervisse servir
SFX iF ervir ervisses servir
SFX iF ervir ervît servir
SFX iF ervir ervissions servir
SFX iF ervir ervissiez servir
SFX iF ervir ervissent servir
SFX iF ervir ers servir
SFX iF ervir ervons servir
SFX iF ervir ervez servir

SFX iG N 42
SFX iG êtir êtant vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtu vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtus vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtue vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtues vêtir
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir
SFX iG êtir êt vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtent vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtais vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtait vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtions vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiez vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtaient vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtis vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtit vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtîmes vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtîtes vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirent vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirai vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiras vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtira vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirons vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirez vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiront vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirais vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirait vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtirions vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiriez vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtiraient vêtir
SFX iG êtir ête vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtes vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtisse vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtisses vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtît vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissions vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissiez vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtissent vêtir
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir

SFX iI N 39
SFX iI ormir ormant dormir
SFX iI ormir ormi dormir
SFX iI ormir ors dormir
SFX iI ormir ort dormir
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir
SFX iI ormir orment dormir
SFX iI ormir ormais dormir
SFX iI ormir ormait dormir
SFX iI ormir ormions dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiez dormir
SFX iI ormir ormaient dormir
SFX iI ormir ormis dormir
SFX iI ormir ormit dormir
SFX iI ormir ormîmes dormir
SFX iI ormir ormîtes dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirent dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirai dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiras dormir
SFX iI ormir ormira dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirons dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirez dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiront dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirais dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirait dormir
SFX iI ormir ormirions dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiriez dormir
SFX iI ormir ormiraient dormir
SFX iI ormir orme dormir
SFX iI ormir ormes dormir
SFX iI ormir ormisse dormir
SFX iI ormir ormisses dormir
SFX iI ormir ormît dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissions dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissiez dormir
SFX iI ormir ormissent dormir
SFX iI ormir ors dormir
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir
